Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-607.3] Nondiscrimination on the
basis of actual gender identity or perceived gender identity; coverage for
services. (a) No individual and group hospital and medical service
policy, contract, plan, or agreement that provides health care coverage shall
discriminate with respect to participation and coverage under the policy,
contract, plan, or agreement against any person on the basis of actual gender
identity or perceived gender identity.

(b) Discrimination under this section includes
the following:

(1) Denying, canceling, limiting, or refusing to
issue or renew an insurance policy, contract, plan, or agreement on the basis
of a person's or the person's family member's actual gender identity or
perceived gender identity;

(2) Demanding or requiring a payment or premium that
is based on a person's or the person's family member's actual gender identity
or perceived gender identity;

(3) Designating a person's or the person's family
member's actual gender identity or perceived gender identity as a preexisting
condition to deny, cancel, or limit coverage; and

(4) Denying, canceling, or limiting coverage for
services on the basis of actual gender identity or perceived gender identity
including but not limited to the following:

(A) Health care services related to gender
transition; provided that there is coverage under the policy, contract, plan,
or agreement for the services when the services are not related to gender
transition; and

(B) Health care services that are ordinarily
or exclusively available to individuals of one sex.

(c) The medical necessity of any treatment
shall be determined pursuant to the insurance policy, contract, plan, or
agreement and shall be defined in a manner that is consistent with other
covered services.

(d) Any coverage provided shall be subject to
copayment, deductible, and coinsurance provisions of an individual and group
hospital and medical service policy, contract, plan, or agreement that are no
less favorable than the copayment, deductible, and coinsurance provisions for
substantially all other medical services covered by the policy, contract, plan,
or agreement.

(e) As used in this section unless the context
requires otherwise:

"Actual gender identity" means a
person's internal sense of being male, female, a gender different from the
gender assigned at birth, a transgender person, or neither male nor female.

"Gender transition" means the process
of a person changing the person's outward appearance or sex characteristics to
accord with the person's actual gender identity.

"Perceived gender identity" means an
observer's impression of another person's actual gender identity or the
observer's own impression that the person is male, female, a gender different
from the gender designed at birth, a transgender person, or neither male nor
female.

"Transgender person" means a person
who has gender identity disorder or gender dysphoria, has received health care
services related to gender transition, adopts the appearance or behavior of the
opposite sex, or otherwise identifies as a gender different from the gender
assigned to that person at birth. [L 2016, c 135, §3]

Note

Applicability of section. L 2016, c 135, §§5, 7.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next